aspell/se_affix.dat
#Verb passive & inkoativ
# -goahtit, -juvvot
SFX O Y 261
SFX O   t               juvvojeadnot            [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvojeadnu             [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvojeahkket           [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvojeahkki            [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvojeahkkot           [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvojeahkku            [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvojehket             [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvojehko              [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvojehkoska           [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvojehkot             [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvojehkoset           [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvojehkon             [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvojehkos             [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvojetnot             [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvoje                 [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvojedne              [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvojetne              [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvojit                [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvojedje              [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvojin                [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvojeaddji            [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvokeahtes            [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvoma                 [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvome                 [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvomen                [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvomin                [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvomis                [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvonvearan            [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvonveara             [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvon                  [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvole                 [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvoleimme             [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvoleidde             [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvoleigga             [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvoleimmet            [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvoleiddet            [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvoledje              [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvolin                [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvolit                [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvolii                [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvoše                 [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvošeimme             [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvošeidde             [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvošeigga             [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvošeimmet            [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvošeiddet            [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvošedje              [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvošin                [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvošit                [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvošii                [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvodettiin            [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvodettiineame        [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvodettiineatte       [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvodettiineaskka      [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvodettiineamet       [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvodettiineattet      [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvodettiineaset       [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvodettiinan          [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvodettiinat          [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvodettiinis          [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvodiin               [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvodin                [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvo                   [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvobeahtti            [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvoba                 [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvot                  [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvobehtet             [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvon                  [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvoš                  [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvože                 [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvožedne              [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvožetne              [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvožeahppi            [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvožeaba              [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvožit                [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvožehpet             [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvožan                [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvožat                [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvoža                 [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvohaga               [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvokeahttá            [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvuime                [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvuide                [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvuiga                [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvuimet               [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvuidet               [eoá]t
SFX O   t               juvvui                  [eoá]t
SFX O   0               juvvojeadnot            o
SFX O   0               juvvojeadnu             o
SFX O   0               juvvojeahkket           o
SFX O   0               juvvojeahkki            o
SFX O   0               juvvojeahkkot           o
SFX O   0               juvvojeahkku            o
SFX O   0               juvvojehket             o
SFX O   0               juvvojehko              o
SFX O   0               juvvojehkoska           o
SFX O   0               juvvojehkot             o
SFX O   0               juvvojehkoset           o
SFX O   0               juvvojehkon             o
SFX O   0               juvvojehkos             o
SFX O   0               juvvojetnot             o
SFX O   0               juvvoje                 o
SFX O   0               juvvojedne              o
SFX O   0               juvvojetne              o
SFX O   0               juvvojit                o
SFX O   0               juvvojedje              o
SFX O   0               juvvojin                o
SFX O   0               juvvojeaddji            o
SFX O   0               juvvokeahtes            o
SFX O   0               juvvoma                 o
SFX O   0               juvvome                 o
SFX O   0               juvvomen                o
SFX O   0               juvvomin                o
SFX O   0               juvvomis                o
SFX O   0               juvvonvearan            o
SFX O   0               juvvonveara             o
SFX O   0               juvvon                  o
SFX O   0               juvvole                 o
SFX O   0               juvvoleimme             o
SFX O   0               juvvoleidde             o
SFX O   0               juvvoleigga             o
SFX O   0               juvvoleimmet            o
SFX O   0               juvvoleiddet            o
SFX O   0               juvvoledje              o
SFX O   0               juvvolin                o
SFX O   0               juvvolit                o
SFX O   0               juvvolii                o
SFX O   0               juvvoše                 o
SFX O   0               juvvošeimme             o
SFX O   0               juvvošeidde             o
SFX O   0               juvvošeigga             o
SFX O   0               juvvošeimmet            o
SFX O   0               juvvošeiddet            o
SFX O   0               juvvošedje              o
SFX O   0               juvvošin                o
SFX O   0               juvvošit                o
SFX O   0               juvvošii                o
SFX O   0               juvvodettiin            o
SFX O   0               juvvodettiineame        o
SFX O   0               juvvodettiineatte       o
SFX O   0               juvvodettiineaskka      o
SFX O   0               juvvodettiineamet       o
SFX O   0               juvvodettiineattet      o
SFX O   0               juvvodettiineaset       o
SFX O   0               juvvodettiinan          o
SFX O   0               juvvodettiinat          o
SFX O   0               juvvodettiinis          o
SFX O   0               juvvodiin               o
SFX O   0               juvvodin                o
SFX O   0               juvvo                   o
SFX O   0               juvvobeahtti            o
SFX O   0               juvvoba                 o
SFX O   0               juvvot                  o
SFX O   0               juvvobehtet             o
SFX O   0               juvvon                  o
SFX O   0               juvvoš                  o
SFX O   0               juvvože                 o
SFX O   0               juvvožedne              o
SFX O   0               juvvožetne              o
SFX O   0               juvvožeahppi            o
SFX O   0               juvvožeaba              o
SFX O   0               juvvožit                o
SFX O   0               juvvožehpet             o
SFX O   0               juvvožan                o
SFX O   0               juvvožat                o
SFX O   0               juvvoža                 o
SFX O   0               juvvohaga               o
SFX O   0               juvvokeahttá            o
SFX O   0               juvvuime                o
SFX O   0               juvvuide                o
SFX O   0               juvvuiga                o
SFX O   0               juvvuimet               o
SFX O   0               juvvuidet               o
SFX O   0               juvvui                  o
SFX O   it              uvvojeadnot            it
SFX O   it              uvvojeadnu             it
SFX O   it              uvvojeahkket           it
SFX O   it              uvvojeahkki            it
SFX O   it              uvvojeahkkot           it
SFX O   it              uvvojeahkku            it
SFX O   it              uvvojehket             it
SFX O   it              uvvojehko              it
SFX O   it              uvvojehkoska           it
SFX O   it              uvvojehkot             it
SFX O   it              uvvojehkoset           it
SFX O   it              uvvojehkon             it
SFX O   it              uvvojehkos             it
SFX O   it              uvvojetnot             it
SFX O   it              uvvoje                 it
SFX O   it              uvvojedne              it
SFX O   it              uvvojetne              it
SFX O   it              uvvojit                it
SFX O   it              uvvojedje              it
SFX O   it              uvvojin                it
SFX O   it              uvvojeaddji            it
SFX O   it              uvvokeahtes            it
SFX O   it              uvvoma                 it
SFX O   it              uvvome                 it
SFX O   it              uvvomen                it
SFX O   it              uvvomin                it
SFX O   it              uvvomis                it
SFX O   it              uvvonvearan            it
SFX O   it              uvvonveara             it
SFX O   it              uvvon                  it
SFX O   it              uvvole                 it
SFX O   it              uvvoleimme             it
SFX O   it              uvvoleidde             it
SFX O   it              uvvoleigga             it
SFX O   it              uvvoleimmet            it
SFX O   it              uvvoleiddet            it
SFX O   it              uvvoledje              it
SFX O   it              uvvolin                it
SFX O   it              uvvolit                it
SFX O   it              uvvolii                it
SFX O   it              uvvoše                 it
SFX O   it              uvvošeimme             it
SFX O   it              uvvošeidde             it
SFX O   it              uvvošeigga             it
SFX O   it              uvvošeimmet            it
SFX O   it              uvvošeiddet            it
SFX O   it              uvvošedje              it
SFX O   it              uvvošin                it
SFX O   it              uvvošit                it
SFX O   it              uvvošii                it
SFX O   it              uvvodettiin            it
SFX O   it              uvvodettiineame        it
SFX O   it              uvvodettiineatte       it
SFX O   it              uvvodettiineaskka      it
SFX O   it              uvvodettiineamet       it
SFX O   it              uvvodettiineattet      it
